Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 75. Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act
§ 57-75-15.
Powers and duties of State Bond Commission.

[From and after July 1, 2022, this section shall read as follows:]

Upon notification to the authority by the enterprise that the state has been finally selected as the site for the project, the State Bond Commission shall have the power and is hereby authorized and directed, upon receipt of a declaration from the authority as hereinafter provided, to borrow money and issue general obligation bonds of the state in one or more series for the purposes herein set out. Upon such notification, the authority may thereafter, from time to time, declare the necessity for the issuance of general obligation bonds as authorized by this section and forward such declaration to the State Bond Commission, provided that before such notification, the authority may enter into agreements with the United States government, private companies and others that will commit the authority to direct the State Bond Commission to issue bonds for eligible undertakings set out in subsection (4) of this section, conditioned on the siting of the project in the state.

Upon receipt of any such declaration from the authority, the State Bond Commission shall verify that the state has been selected as the site of the project and shall act as the issuing agent for the series of bonds directed to be issued in such declaration pursuant to authority granted in this section.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(i) shall not exceed an aggregate principal amount in the sum of Sixty-seven Million Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($67,350,000.00).

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) shall not exceed Seventy-one Million Dollars ($71,000,000.00). The authority, with the express direction of the State Bond Commission, is authorized to expend any remaining proceeds of bonds issued under the authority of this act prior to January 1, 1998, for the purpose of financing projects as then defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii) or for any other projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii), as it may be amended from time to time. No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph (b) until the State Bond Commission by resolution adopts a finding that the issuance of such bonds will improve, expand or otherwise enhance the military installation, its support areas or military operations, or will provide employment opportunities to replace those lost by closure or reductions in operations at the military installation or will support critical studies or investigations authorized by Section 57-75-5(f)(ii).

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iii) shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after December 31, 1996.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) shall not exceed Three Hundred Fifty-one Million Dollars ($351,000,000.00). An additional amount of bonds in an amount not to exceed Twelve Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($12,500,000.00) may be issued under the authority of this section for the purpose of defraying costs associated with the construction of surface water transmission lines for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) or for any facility related to the project. No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2005.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v) and for facilities related to such projects shall not exceed Thirty-eight Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($38,500,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 1, 2005.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(vii) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2006.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(viii) shall not exceed Four Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($4,500,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2008.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ix) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2007.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(x) shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 1, 2005.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xii) shall not exceed Thirty-three Million Dollars ($33,000,000.00). The amount of bonds that may be issued under this paragraph for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xii) may be reduced by the amount of any federal or local funds made available for such projects. No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph until local governments in or near the county in which the project is located have irrevocably committed funds to the project in an amount of not less than Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) in the aggregate; however, this irrevocable commitment requirement may be waived by the authority upon a finding that due to the unforeseen circumstances created by Hurricane Katrina, the local governments are unable to comply with such commitment. No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2008.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiii) shall not exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv) shall not exceed Twenty-four Million Dollars ($24,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph until local governments in the county in which the project is located have irrevocably committed funds to the project in an amount of not less than Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xv) shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2009.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xvi) shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2011.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xvii) shall not exceed Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2010.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii) shall not exceed Ninety-six Million Dollars ($96,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2016.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xix) shall not exceed Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after June 30, 2012.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx) shall not exceed Twenty-three Million Dollars ($23,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 25, 2013.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) shall not exceed Two Hundred Ninety-three Million Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($293,900,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for Tier One suppliers shall not exceed Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii) shall not exceed Forty-eight Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($48,400,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiii) shall not exceed Eighty-eight Million Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($88,250,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2009.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxiv) shall not exceed Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2020.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxv) shall not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2017.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvi) shall not exceed Thirty-five Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($35,100,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2021.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxvii) shall not exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after April 25, 2013.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) shall not exceed One Hundred Thirty Million Dollars ($130,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2023.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) shall not exceed Two Hundred Sixty-three Million Dollars ($263,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2034.

Bonds issued under the authority of this section for projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxx) shall not exceed Eleven Million Dollars ($11,000,000.00). No bonds shall be issued under this paragraph after July 1, 2025.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued under this section may be applied for the following purposes:

Defraying all or any designated portion of the costs incurred with respect to acquisition, planning, design, construction, installation, rehabilitation, improvement, relocation and with respect to state-owned property, operation and maintenance of the project and any facility related to the project located within the project area, including costs of design and engineering, all costs incurred to provide land, easements and rights-of-way, relocation costs with respect to the project and with respect to any facility related to the project located within the project area, and costs associated with mitigation of environmental impacts and environmental impact studies;

Defraying the cost of providing for the recruitment, screening, selection, training or retraining of employees, candidates for employment or replacement employees of the project and any related activity;

Reimbursing the Mississippi Development Authority for expenses it incurred in regard to projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) prior to November 6, 2000. The Mississippi Development Authority shall submit an itemized list of expenses it incurred in regard to such projects to the Chairmen of the Finance and Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the Chairmen of the Ways and Means and Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives;

Providing grants to enterprises operating projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1;

Paying any warranty made by the authority regarding site work for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1;

Defraying the cost of marketing and promotion of a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxii). The authority shall submit an itemized list of costs incurred for marketing and promotion of such project to the Chairmen of the Finance and Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the Chairmen of the Ways and Means and Appropriations Committees of the House of Representatives;

Providing for the payment of interest on the bonds;

Providing debt service reserves;

Paying underwriters’ discount, original issue discount, accountants’ fees, engineers’ fees, attorneys’ fees, rating agency fees and other fees and expenses in connection with the issuance of the bonds;

For purposes authorized in paragraphs (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) of this subsection (4);

Providing grants to enterprises operating projects defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(v), or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate;

Providing grant funds or loans to a public agency or an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(ii);

Providing grant funds or loans to an enterprise owning, leasing or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xiv);

Providing grants, loans and payments to or for the benefit of an enterprise owning or operating a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xviii);

Purchasing equipment for a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(viii) subject to such terms and conditions as the authority considers necessary and appropriate;

Providing grant funds to an enterprise developing or owning a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xx);

Providing grants and loans for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(kk), (ll), (mm), (uu), (vv) or, in connection with a facility related to such a project, for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate;

Providing grants for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(pp) for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate;

Providing grants and loans for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(qq);

Providing grants for projects as authorized in Section 57-75-11(rr);

Providing grants, loans and payments as authorized in Section 57-75-11(ss);

Providing loans as authorized in Section 57-75-11(tt); and

Providing grants as authorized in Section 57-75-11(ww) for any purposes deemed by the authority in its sole discretion to be necessary and appropriate.

Such bonds shall be issued, from time to time, and in such principal amounts as shall be designated by the authority, not to exceed in aggregate principal amounts the amount authorized in subsection (3) of this section. Proceeds from the sale of the bonds issued under this section may be invested, subject to federal limitations, pending their use, in such securities as may be specified in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture securing them, and the earning on such investment applied as provided in such resolution or trust indenture.

(i) The proceeds of bonds issued after June 21, 2002, under this section for projects described in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in providing assistance related to a project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds. The Mississippi Development Authority shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought. Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(i) shall not exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) in the aggregate. Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(i) shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The proceeds of bonds issued after June 21, 2002, under this section for projects described in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Audit in providing services related to a project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds. The Department of Audit shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought. The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(ii) shall not exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) in the aggregate. Reimbursements under this paragraph (b)(ii) shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds of bonds issued under this section for a project described in Section 57-75-5(f) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Mississippi Development Authority in providing assistance related to the project for which funding is provided for the use of proceeds of such bonds. The Mississippi Development Authority shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought. Reimbursements under this paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each project.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds of bonds issued under this section for a project described in Section 57-75-5(f) may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Audit in providing services related to the project for which funding is provided from the use of proceeds of such bonds. The Department of Audit shall maintain an accounting of actual costs incurred for each project for which reimbursements are sought. The Department of Audit may escalate its budget and expend such funds in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. Reimbursements under this paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each project. Reimbursements under this paragraph shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable in the manner hereinafter set forth. The bonds shall bear date or dates; be in such denomination or denominations; bear interest at such rate or rates; be payable at such place or places within or without the state; mature absolutely at such time or times; be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium; bear such registration privileges; and be substantially in such form; all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission except that such bonds shall mature or otherwise be retired in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from the date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five (25) years from the date thereof. The bonds shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be imprinted on or affixed thereto, attested by the manual or facsimile signature of the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. Whenever any such bonds have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds, who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code and in exercising the powers granted by this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code.

The State Bond Commission shall act as issuing agent for the bonds, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds on sealed bids at public sale, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of the bonds. The State Bond Commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. The bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101 as shall be fixed by the State Bond Commission. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; provided that the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any bonds shall be published at least one time, the first of which shall be made not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that the bonds, at the option of the state, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

State bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be the general obligations of the state and backed by the full faith and credit of the state. The Legislature shall appropriate annually an amount sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due. All bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section.

The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants payable out of any funds appropriated by the Legislature under this section for such purpose, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of and interest on all bonds issued under the provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

The bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this chapter. Any resolution providing for the issuance of general obligation bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

In anticipation of the issuance of bonds hereunder, the State Bond Commission is authorized to negotiate and enter into any purchase, loan, credit or other agreement with any bank, trust company or other lending institution or to issue and sell interim notes for the purpose of making any payments authorized under this section. All borrowings made under this provision shall be evidenced by notes of the state which shall be issued from time to time, for such amounts not exceeding the amount of bonds authorized herein, in such form and in such denomination and subject to such terms and conditions of sale and issuance, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest not to exceed the maximum rate authorized herein for bonds, and time of payment of interest as the State Bond Commission shall agree to in such agreement. Such notes shall constitute general obligations of the state and shall be backed by the full faith and credit of the state. Such notes may also be issued for the purpose of refunding previously issued notes. No note shall mature more than three (3) years following the date of its issuance. The State Bond Commission is authorized to provide for the compensation of any purchaser of the notes by payment of a fixed fee or commission and for all other costs and expenses of issuance and service, including paying agent costs. Such costs and expenses may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.

The bonds and interim notes authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The necessary papers for such validation proceedings shall be transmitted to the State Bond Attorney, and the required notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

Any bonds or interim notes issued under the provisions of this chapter, a transaction relating to the sale or securing of such bonds or interim notes, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes.

All bonds issued under this chapter shall be legal investments for trustees, other fiduciaries, savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the State Bond Commission in issuing, selling and validating bonds herein provided for, and the Bond Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds authorized under this chapter.

There is hereby created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Fund wherein shall be deposited the proceeds of the bonds issued under this chapter and all monies received by the authority to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Expenditures authorized herein shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn from the fund, and the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue warrants upon requisitions signed by the director of the authority.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund from which the principal of and interest on such bonds shall be paid by appropriation. All monies paid into the sinking fund not appropriated to pay accruing bonds and interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in such securities as are provided by law for the investment of the sinking funds of the state.

In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be cancelled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as cancelled and paid bonds and notes and thereafter all payments of interest thereon shall cease and the cancelled bonds, notes and coupons, together with any other cancelled bonds, notes and coupons, shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two (2) years after cancellation. A certificate evidencing the destruction of the cancelled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the seller.

The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the Department of Finance and Administration and Legislative Budget Office by September 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of the principal of and interest on outstanding obligations for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments. It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every executive budget submitted to the Legislature full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of this chapter and the status of the sinking fund for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and notes.

Any monies repaid to the state from loans authorized in Section 57-75-11(hh) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund unless the State Bond Commission, at the request of the authority, shall determine that such loan repayments are needed to provide additional loans as authorized under Section 57-75-11(hh). For purposes of providing additional loans, there is hereby created the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Revolving Loan Fund and loan repayments shall be deposited into the fund. The fund shall be maintained for such period as determined by the State Bond Commission for the sole purpose of making additional loans as authorized by Section 57-75-11(hh). Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund and any interest earned on amounts in such fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

Any monies repaid to the state from loans authorized in Section 57-75-11(ii) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund.

Any monies repaid to the state from loans authorized in Section 57-75-11(jj) or Section 57-75-11(vv) shall be deposited into the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority Sinking Fund.

Upon receipt of a declaration by the authority that it has determined that the state is a potential site for a project, the State Bond Commission is authorized and directed to authorize the State Treasurer to borrow money from any special fund in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated to be utilized by the authority for the purposes provided for in this subsection.

The proceeds of the money borrowed under this subsection may be utilized by the authority for the purpose of defraying all or a portion of the costs incurred by the authority with respect to acquisition options and planning, design and environmental impact studies with respect to a project defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix). The authority may escalate its budget and expend the proceeds of the money borrowed under this subsection in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds.

The authority shall request an appropriation or additional authority to issue general obligation bonds to repay the borrowed funds and establish a date for the repayment of the funds so borrowed.

Borrowings made under the provisions of this subsection shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) at any one time.

History.
Laws, 1989, ch. 534, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 13; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 4; Laws, 1993, ch. 305, § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 570, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 420, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 576, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 508, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 554, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 585, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 584, § 6; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 45; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 541, § 7; Laws, 2002, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 3, § 3; Laws, 2003, ch. 326, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 513, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 507, § 2; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 93; Laws, 2005, ch. 315, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 521, § 3; Laws, 2005, 4th Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 538, § 8; Laws, 2006, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 4; Laws, 2007, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 45, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 302, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 303, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 301, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 405, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 34; Laws, 2013, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; brought forward without change by Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 2016, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 511, § 18; Laws, 2017, ch. 390, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 412, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, HB1427, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2018, ch. 412, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2022.